Louisiana, session 2025s1, HB2.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. A special statewide election shall be held on Saturday, May 16, 2026, for
the purpose of submitting to the electors of the state proposed constitutional amendments
contained in joint resolutions concurred in by each house of the legislature during the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 251ES-9 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 2
Section 2. The election for which provision is made in this Act shall be held in
compliance with and subject to the applicable provisions of the Louisiana Election Code.
Section 3. Section 2 of Act No. 218 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 2. Be it further resolved that this proposed amendment shall be
submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at a statewide election to be held
on April 18, 2026, if House Bill No. 625 of the 2025 Regular Session of the
Legislature of Louisiana becomes effective. If House Bill No. 625 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana does not become effective, this
proposed amendment shall be submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at
a statewide election to be held on November 3, 2026. May 16, 2026.
Section 4. Section 2 of Act No. 219 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 2. Be it further resolved that this proposed amendment shall be
submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at the statewide election to be held
on April 18, 2026. May 16, 2026.
Section 5. Section 3 of Act No. 221 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 3. Be it further resolved that this proposed amendment shall be
submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at the statewide election to be held
on April 18, 2026. May 16, 2026.
Section 6. Section 8 of Act No. 222 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 8. Be it further resolved that this proposed amendment shall be
submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at the statewide election to be held
on April 18, 2026. May 16, 2026.
Section 7. Section 2 of Act No. 223 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 251ES-9 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 2
Section 2. Be it further resolved that this proposed amendment shall be
submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at a statewide election to be held
on April 18, 2026, if House Bill No. 625 of the 2025 Regular Session of the
Legislature of Louisiana becomes effective. If House Bill No. 625 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana does not become effective, this
proposed amendment shall be submitted to the electors of the state of Louisiana at
a statewide election to be held on November 3, 2026. May 16, 2026.
Section 8. Act No. 212 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature is hereby
repealed in its entirety.
Section 9. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.